Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8721
Immunity from liability.

Any person who receives or releases information in the form and manner prescribed by the Patient Safety Improvement Act and the procedures established by a patient safety organization shall not be civilly or criminally liable for such receipt or release unless the receipt or release is done with actual malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith. A patient safety organization shall not be liable civilly for the release of nonidentifiable aggregate trend data identifying the number and types of patient safety events that occur. Because the candid and conscientious evaluation of patient safety events is essential to the improvement of medical care and to encourage improvements in patient safety, any provider furnishing services to a patient safety organization shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of such acts, omissions, decisions, or other such conduct in connection with the duties on behalf of a patient safety organization if done pursuant to the Patient Safety Improvement Act except for acts done with actual malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 21.